Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5208YC (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.146, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) Establish issuance and renewal requirements, provided 3 that a continuing education requirement may be completed by 4 electronic means, continuing education requirements shall 5 relate directly to the practice of the licensed profession, 6 and there shall be no renewal requirement for a practitioner 7 who has been employed as a practitioner for at least ten years 8 and who possesses a masterâs or doctoral degree, unless the 9 practitioner holds an evaluator approval endorsement, which 10 must be renewed at least once every ten years. 11 Sec. 2. Section 272C.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. Not include any requirements that are not 14 directly related to the practice of the licensed profession. 15 Sec. 3. ATTORNEY LICENSING ââ COURT RULES. The supreme 16 court shall adopt or amend Iowa court rules for continuing 17 education requirements for licensed attorneys, such that the 18 rules shall not include any requirements that are not directly 19 related to the practice of law. 20